New Mexico, session 2026, SB196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the local government division of the department of finance and administration for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to contract for services for spay and neuter programs and veterinary care at the Las Vegas animal care center and to make improvements to the center. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -